Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-332] Construction of this part.
The powers conferred by this part shall be in addition and supplemental to the
powers conferred by any other law. Insofar as the provisions of this part are
inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, this part shall control. [L
2006, c 148, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next